Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-804
Assessments; when authorized.

No assessment shall be made on a member for liability occurring prior to his membership. A member may be excluded from all benefits during the time he is in default of payment of any assessment.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 126, p. 463;

R.S.1913, § 3263;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 3, p. 644;

C.S.1922, § 7862;

C.S.1929, § 44-903;

R.S.1943, § 44-804.